Vermont, session 2025-2026, H590.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 33 V.S.A. chapter 52, subchapter 6 is amended to read:
Subchapter 6. Placement in Secure Facilities
§ 5291. DETENTION OR TREATMENT OF INDIVIDUALS CHARGED
AS DELINQUENTS IN SECURE FACILITIES FOR THE
DETENTION OR TREATMENT OF DELINQUENT CHILDREN
(a) Prior to disposition, the court shall have the sole authority to place a
child who is in the custody of the Department in a secure facility used for the
detention or treatment of delinquent children until the Commissioner
determines that a suitable placement is available for the child. The court shall
VT LEG #386232 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.590
2026 Page 2 of 7
not order placement in a secure facility without a recommendation from the
Department that placement in a secure facility is necessary. The court order
shall include a finding that no other suitable placement is available and the
child presents a risk of injury to himself or herself the child, to others, or to
property.
(b) Absent good cause shown and notwithstanding section 5227 of this
title, when a child is placed in a secure facility pursuant to subsection (a) of
this section and remains in a secure facility for 45 days following the
preliminary hearing, the merits hearing shall be held and merits adjudicated
within 45 days of after the date of the preliminary hearing or the court shall
dismiss the petition with prejudice. If merits have been found, the court shall
review the secure facility placement order at the merits hearing.
(c) If a child is placed in a secure facility pursuant to subsection (a) of this
section and secure facility placement continues following the merits hearing
review pursuant to subsection (b) of this section, the court shall, within 35 days
of after the merits adjudication:
(1) hold the disposition hearing; or
(2) if disposition is not held within 35 days, hold a hearing to review the
continued secure facility placement.
(d) A child placed in a secure facility on an order pursuant to subsection
(a), (b), or (c) of this section with a finding that no other suitable placement is
VT LEG #386232 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.590
2026 Page 3 of 7
available and the child presents a risk of harm to others or to property shall be
entitled to an independent, second evidentiary hearing, which shall be a
hearing de novo by a single justice of the Vermont Supreme Court. The Chief
Justice may make an appointment or special assignment in accordance with 4
V.S.A. § 22 to conduct the de novo hearing required by this subsection.
Unless the parties stipulate to the admission of portions of the trial court
record, the de novo review shall be a new evidentiary hearing without regard to
the record compiled before the trial court.
(e) Following disposition, the Commissioner shall have the sole authority
to place a child who is in the custody of the Department in a secure facility for
the detention or treatment of delinquent children pursuant to the Department’s
administrative policies on admission.
§ 5292. PROHIBITION ON DETENTION IN ADULT FACILITIES OF
MINORS CHARGED OR ADJUDICATED AS DELINQUENTS
(a) A minor charged with a delinquent act shall not be detained under this
chapter in a jail or other facility intended or used for the detention of adults
unless the child is alleged to have committed a crime punishable by life
imprisonment and it appears to the satisfaction of the court that public safety
and protection reasonably require such detention.
(b) A minor who has been adjudicated as a delinquent child shall not by
virtue of such adjudication be committed or transferred to an institution or
VT LEG #386232 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.590
2026 Page 4 of 7
other facility used primarily for the execution of sentences of persons
convicted of a crime.
(c) The official in charge of a jail or other facility intended or used for the
detention of adult offenders or persons charged with crime shall inform the
court immediately when a minor who is or appears to be under the age of 18
years of age is received at the facility other than pursuant to subsection (a) of
this section or section 5293 of this title and shall deliver the minor to the court
upon request of the court or transfer the minor to the detention facility
designated by the court by order.
§ 5293. DISPOSITION PROHIBITION ON DETENTION IN ADULT
FACILITIES OF MINORS ADJUDICATED AS ADULT
OFFENDERS; SEPARATION OF PERSONS UNDER 18 YEARS
FROM ADULTS
(a) Pretrial detention.
(1) A minor who is under the age of 18 years of age who has been
arrested shall not be placed in a facility for adult offenders unless a felony
charge has been filed in the Criminal Division of the Superior Court or the
Criminal Division of the Superior Court has exercised jurisdiction over the
matter and the State’s Attorney has determined that a felony charge will be
filed without delay. A minor who is eligible for release under 13 V.S.A.
chapter 229 shall be released.
VT LEG #386232 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.590
2026 Page 5 of 7
(2)(A) A minor who is under the age of 18 years of age who has been
arrested for a misdemeanor shall immediately and without first being taken
elsewhere:
(i) be released to his or her the minor’s custodial parent, guardian,
or custodian; or
(ii) be delivered to the Criminal Division of the Superior Court.
(B) If the minor is delivered to the Criminal Division of the Superior
Court, the arresting officer shall immediately file written notice thereof with
the court together with a statement of the reason for taking the minor into
custody. A minor who is eligible for release under 13 V.S.A. chapter 229 shall
be released. In the event that the minor is not released:
(i) the minor shall not be detained in a facility for adult offenders;
and
(ii) the court shall defer to the Commissioner of Corrections
concerning the facility in which the minor shall be detained.
(b) Sentencing of minor. If a minor is convicted of an offense in a court of
criminal jurisdiction as an adult, the court shall sentence the minor as an adult.
(c) Placement of minors under 16 18 years of age. The Commissioner of
Corrections shall not place a minor under the age of 16 18 years of age who
has been sentenced to a term of imprisonment in a correctional facility used to
house adult offenders.
VT LEG #386232 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.590
2026 Page 6 of 7
(d) Placement of minors over 16 convicted of felony. The Commissioner
of Corrections may place in a facility for adult offenders a minor who has
attained the age of 16 but is under the age of 18 who has been convicted of a
felony and who has been sentenced to a term of imprisonment. [Repealed.]
(e) Placement of minor over 16 convicted of misdemeanor. The
Commissioner of Corrections shall not place in a facility for adult offenders a
minor who has attained the age of 16 but is under the age of 18 who has been
convicted of a misdemeanor. [Repealed.]
(f) Transfer of minor at 18th birthday. At the 18th birthday of a minor
convicted of a misdemeanor, the Commissioner may transfer the minor to a
facility for adult offenders.
(g) Applicability. The provisions of this section shall apply to the
commitment of minors to institutions within or outside the State of Vermont.
§ 5294. INTERESTS OF JUSTICE HEARING
Not later than the next business day after a juvenile who is awaiting trial or
other legal process and who is treated as an adult for prosecution in the
Criminal Division is taken into custody, the court shall hold a hearing and
determine whether to issue a written order, pursuant to 34 U.S.C. §
11133(a)(11)(B), that it is in the interests of justice to hold the juvenile in a jail
or other secure facility for adults owned or operated by the Department of
Corrections and, if such an order is issued, whether to allow sight or sound
VT LEG #386232 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.590
2026 Page 7 of 7
contact with adult inmates. Hearings held and orders issued pursuant to this
section shall conform with the requirements of 34 U.S.C. § 11133(a)(11)(B),
including the criteria set forth therein. [Repealed.]
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
VT LEG #386232 v.1